Missouri, session 2026, HB2989.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 313.820, 572.010, 572.020, 572.070, and 572.100, RSMo, are
repealed and twenty-two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 27.180,
43.375, 313.425, 313.427, 313.429, 313.431, 313.433, 313.435, 313.437, 313.438, 313.439,
313.440, 313.441, 313.442, 313.443, 313.444, 313.445, 313.820, 572.010, 572.020, 572.070,
and 572.100, to read as follows:
27.180. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Illegal Gaming
Enforcement Fund", which shall consist of moneys received by the state treasury
pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection 3 of section 313.429 or other funds so
appropriated. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. Moneys in
the fund shall be used by the attorney general, prosecutors, and law enforcement to
investigate, enforce, charge, and prosecute violations of chapter 572. Notwithstanding
the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the
end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state
treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the
fund.
43.375. 1. Notwithstanding the requirements of section 43.380, the Missouri
state highway patrol may investigate violations of chapter 572 and any other criminal
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2989 2
offenses stemming from or related to video lottery games or other illegal gambling
activity.
2. To facilitate investigations under this section, the highway patrol shall have at
least one investigator per troop region who shall focus on investigations under this
section. Investigators assigned under this subsection may be assigned other duties as the
superintendent sees fit, so long as a majority of their time remains focused on
enforcement under this section.
3. Subject to appropriations, investigators under this section shall be funded
primarily by moneys received from the illegal gaming enforcement fund. The Missouri
lottery commission shall provide funding for expenses that are reasonably related to the
enforcement of this section. Investigators under this section shall not be subject to the
cap in subsection 1 of section 43.050.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Missouri lottery commission
is authorized to share files in the possession of the commission with the highway patrol
in furtherance of activities under this section.
5. The superintendent of the highway patrol may enter into a cooperative
agreement with the Missouri lottery commission for the purpose of conducting
background investigations for licenses issued by the commission under chapter 313, as
well as any other activities ancillary to criminal investigations under this section, in a
manner agreeable to both parties. The Missouri lottery commission may make transfers
from the state lottery fund or other appropriations to the Missouri state highway patrol
gambling crimes investigation fund for services under such cooperative agreement, in
accordance with applicable spending authorities.
6. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri State Highway
Patrol Gambling Crimes Investigation Fund", which shall consist of the following:
(1) Moneys transferred to the fund pursuant to section 313.429;
(2) Funds appropriated by the legislature for such purpose;
(3) Funds transferred from the state lottery fund or other appropriations
pursuant to a cooperative agreement under this section.
7. The Missouri state highway patrol gambling crimes investigation fund shall be
utilized for:
(1) Expenses incurred relating to employing and equipping investigators
assigned under this section, except that any funds utilized for these purposes shall be in
addition to funds under subsection 2 of section 43.370; and
(2) Expenses for equipment, training, travel, or other personnel costs with a
discernible nexus to criminal gambling enforcement or the cooperative agreement under
this section.

HCS HB 2989 3
8. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the Missouri state highway patrol
gambling crimes investigation fund. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to
the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not
revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys
in the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys
earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
9. Nothing in this section shall be read to give the highway patrol any authority
to conduct regulatory compliance activities on behalf of the commission except where
expressly provided for.
313.425. Sections 313.425 to 313.445 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Missouri Video Lottery Regulatory Act" and shall provide additional funding for
Missouri education programs and additional resources for Missouri municipalities and
counties by establishing a licensing and regulatory framework for a system of video
lottery game terminals to conduct video lottery games.
313.427. As used in sections 313.425 to 313.445, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Adjusted gross gaming revenue", the amount of revenue generated by a
video lottery game terminal that is remaining after:
(a) Payment of winnings to players; and
(b) Deduction by the commission of that amount necessary to pay direct
administrative costs for the operation of the central control system, but before
deduction of the adjusted gross gaming revenue tax;
(2) "Adjusted gross gaming revenue tax", a tax of thirty-one percent imposed on
adjusted gross gaming revenue;
(3) "Central control system", a computer system developed or procured by the
commission that connects all video lottery game terminals, redemption terminals, and
other necessary equipment using standard industry protocols capable of monitoring
activity on a video lottery game terminal, redemption terminal, and other necessary
equipment, and that can activate or deactivate a video lottery gaming terminal;
(4) "Commission" or "lottery commission", the state lottery commission
appointed by the governor to manage and oversee the lottery under section 313.215;
(5) "Department", the Missouri department of revenue;
(6) "Municipality and county administration tax", a tax of three percent
imposed on adjusted gross gaming revenue;
(7) "Net terminal income", the amount of adjusted gross gaming revenue
remaining after deduction of the gross gaming revenue tax and municipality and county
administration tax, which shall be divided equally between the video lottery game
operator and the video lottery game retailer;

HCS HB 2989 4
(8) "Person", an individual, partnership, corporation, or limited liability
company;
(9) "Use agreement", a contract executed by and between a video lottery game
operator and a video lottery game retailer, approved by the commission containing
minimum terms and conditions determined by the commission establishing the right of
the video lottery game operator to place and operate video lottery game terminals on the
premises of a video lottery game retailer;
(10) "Video lottery game", any game approved by the commission for play on a
video lottery game terminal;
(11) "Video lottery game distributor", a person licensed by the commission who
distributes video lottery games, video lottery game terminals, redemption terminals,
ancillary equipment, or parts and components for video lottery gaming terminals
approved by the commission for sale to video lottery game distributors or video lottery
game operators;
(12) "Video lottery game handler", a person licensed by the commission and
employed by a video lottery game operator to handle, place, operate, and service video
lottery game terminals, redemption terminals, and ancillary equipment;
(13) "Video lottery game manufacturer", a person licensed by the commission
who manufactures video lottery games, video lottery game terminals, redemption
terminals, ancillary equipment, or parts and components for video lottery game
terminals or video lottery games approved by the commission for sale to video lottery
game operators and video lottery game distributors;
(14) "Video lottery game operator", a person licensed by the commission who
owns, rents, or leases video lottery games and video lottery game terminals for
placement and operation at the business premises of a licensed video lottery game
retailer;
(15) "Video lottery game redemption terminal" or "redemption terminal", the
collective hardware, software, and other ancillary equipment approved by the
commission used to redeem a video lottery game ticket for cash;
(16) "Video lottery game retailer", a person licensed by the commission to enter
into use agreements with video lottery game operators for the placement of video lottery
game terminals at the business premises of the licensed video lottery game retailer who
meets the requirements of a lottery game retailer under section 313.260. No person with
a primary purpose of providing entertainment, activities, or educational services to
anyone under the age of twenty-one shall be licensed as a video lottery game retailer;
(17) "Video lottery game terminal", any device that, through an electronic,
mechanical, or electromechanical process, including through the use of any application,

HCS HB 2989 5
software, or other system that accepts legal tender, credits or tickets, or forms of digital
currency to play, and through which is used to generate a prize of money or form of
credit that can be redeemed for money or another form of monetary payment that is
presented to the player by a set or combination of alphanumeric symbols or lines of
symbols that determine the amount of the prize, regardless of the operating system that
determined the prize;
(18) "Video lottery game terminal credit", credits either purchased or won on a
video lottery game terminal that may be used to play video lottery games or be
converted into a video lottery game ticket;
(19) "Video lottery game ticket", a document printed or provided electronically
by a video lottery game terminal at the conclusion of any video lottery game play or
series of plays that may be redeemed for cash at a redemption terminal located on the
premises of the video lottery game retailer, or that may be reinserted into a video lottery
game terminal for video lottery game play on the premises of the video lottery game
retailer where such ticket was issued.
313.429. 1. (1) The commission shall implement a system of video lottery game
terminals and issue licenses to video lottery game manufacturers, video lottery game
distributors, video lottery game operators, video lottery game handlers, and video
lottery game retailers; provided, however, that:
(a) No person licensed as a video lottery game manufacturer or a video lottery
game distributor shall be issued a license as a video lottery game operator or video
lottery game retailer;
(b) No person licensed as a video lottery game operator shall be issued a license
as a video lottery game manufacturer, video lottery game distributor, or video lottery
game retailer;
(c) No person licensed as a video lottery game retailer shall be issued a license as
a video lottery game manufacturer, video lottery game distributor, or video lottery game
operator.
(2) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a video lottery game manufacturer or
a video lottery gaming distributor from being licensed as both a video lottery game
manufacturer and a video lottery game distributor. Nothing in this subsection shall
prevent a video lottery game manufacturer or a video lottery game distributor from
contracting with the commission to provide or operate the central control system.
(3) The commission shall not authorize or allow a single video lottery game
manufacturer or video lottery game distributor as the sole or exclusive manufacturer or
distributor of video lottery game terminals, video lottery games, or redemption
terminals in Missouri.

HCS HB 2989 6
(4) The commission shall ensure that the video lottery game system authorized
by sections 313.425 to 313.437 shall allow for multiple video lottery game
manufacturers, video lottery game distributors, video lottery game operators, and
video lottery game retailers to encourage private sector investment and job
opportunities for Missouri citizens.
2. Video lottery game terminals and video lottery games shall meet independent
testing standards approved by the commission, as tested by one or more licensed
independent test labs. The commission shall promulgate rules for minimum standards
for video lottery game terminals, video lottery games, and redemption terminals. Such
minimum standards shall include:
(1) Video lottery game terminals shall conform to all requirements of federal law
and regulations, including FCC Class A Emission Standards;
(2) Video lottery game terminals and video lottery games shall theoretically pay
out a mathematically demonstrable percentage during the expected lifetime of the
terminal of all amounts played, which shall not be less than eighty percent. The
commission shall establish a maximum payout percentage for approved models by rule.
Video lottery game terminals that may be affected by skill shall meet this standard when
using a method of play that will provide the greatest return to the player over a period
of continuous play;
(3) Video lottery game terminals shall use a random number generator
computer, software, or similar random selection process to generate and produce an
independent and random outcome of each play of a video lottery game. The random
selection process shall meet ninety-nine percent confidence limits using a standard chi-
squared test for goodness of fit;
(4) Video lottery game terminals shall display an accurate representation of the
video lottery game outcome;
(5) Video lottery game terminals shall not automatically alter pay tables or any
function of the video lottery game terminal based on internal computation of hold
percentage or have any means of manipulation that affects the random selection process
or probabilities of winning a game;
(6) Video lottery game terminals shall not be adversely affected by static
discharge or other electromagnetic interference;
(7) Video lottery game terminals shall, while in an idle state or on demand, be
capable of detecting and displaying "power reset", "door open", and "door just
closed";
(8) Video lottery game terminals shall have the capacity to display complete play
history including, but not limited to, outcome, intermediate play steps, credits available,

HCS HB 2989 7
bets placed, credits paid, and credits cashed out, for the most recent game played and
ten games played immediately prior thereto;
(9) The theoretical payback percentage of a video lottery game terminal shall not
be capable of being changed without making a hardware or software change in the video
lottery game terminal, either on site or through the central control system;
(10) Video lottery game terminals shall be designed so that replacement of parts
or modules required for normal maintenance does not necessitate replacement of the
electromechanical meters;
(11) Video lottery game terminals shall have one or more mechanisms that
accept cash in the form of bills and accepting tickets. The mechanisms shall be designed
to prevent obtaining credits without paying by stringing, slamming, drilling, or other
means. If such attempts at physical tampering are made, the video lottery game
terminal shall suspend itself from operating until reset;
(12) Video lottery game terminals shall have accounting software that keeps an
electronic record of information including, but not limited to, total cash inserted, value
of winning tickets claimed by players, total credits played, total credits awarded by a
video lottery game terminal, and payback percentage credited to players of each video
lottery game;
(13) Video lottery game terminals shall be capable of issuing and accepting
tickets for play, commonly known as "ticket-in ticket-out". Video lottery game
terminals shall not directly dispense anything of value except for tickets representing
credits purchased or won on a video lottery game terminal. The ticket shall indicate the
total amount of award, the time of day in a twenty-four-hour format showing hours and
minutes, the date, the video lottery game terminal serial number, the sequential number
of the ticket, and an encrypted validation number from which the validity of the prize
may be determined;
(14) Video lottery game terminals and redemption terminals shall be connected
to the central control system approved by the commission. The commission shall
provide licensed video lottery game operators with the necessary protocols to connect
video lottery game terminals to the central control system after such video lottery game
terminals have been approved by the commission. No video lottery game terminal shall
be placed in operation without first connecting to the central control system and shall
remain connected to the central control system at all times a video lottery game terminal
is made available for play;
(15) The commission shall adopt rules to identify the location, by municipality
and county, of each video lottery game terminal being operated in the state and
connected to the central control system. The commission shall adopt rules to maintain a

HCS HB 2989 8
current list of such information, and shall provide said list to the department of revenue
to ensure accurate taxation and reporting; and
(16) No device that was previously determined to be an illegal gambling machine
100 by the commission shall be licensed as a video lottery game terminal.
101 3. (1) The commission shall impose an initial nonrefundable administrative
102 license application fee that shall be submitted when the application is filed and deposited
103 in the state lottery fund as follows:
104 (a) For video lottery game manufacturers and video lottery game distributors,
105 twenty-five thousand dollars;
106 (b) For video lottery game operators, one hundred thousand dollars;
107 (c) For video lottery game retailer establishments, one thousand dollars for each
108 video lottery game retailer establishment; and
109 (d) For video lottery game handlers, one hundred dollars.
110 (2) The initial license shall be for a period of one year. Thereafter, renewals of
111 such license shall be for a period of four years. Subsequent to the initial one-year
112 period, anyone licensed pursuant to this subsection shall submit an annual
113 nonrefundable fee to be deposited in the state lottery fund. Such fee shall be paid as
114 follows:
115 (a) Five thousand dollars for video lottery game manufacturers and video lottery
116 game distributors;
117 (b) Fifty thousand dollars for video lottery game operators;
118 (c) One hundred dollars for video lottery game handlers; and
119 (d) One thousand dollars for each establishment owned and operated by a video
120 lottery game retailer.
121 (3) In addition to any other fees imposed by sections 313.425 to 313.445, an
122 annual nonrefundable administrative fee of one thousand dollars shall be paid to the
123 department for each video lottery game terminal placed in service, and shall be deemed
124 an administrative fee on the device itself and not on the operation or play thereof. Such
125 annual administrative fee shall be equally divided and paid by the video lottery game
126 operator and the video lottery game retailer to the department once per year. The
127 department shall remit two hundred dollars of the fee to the commission, which shall
128 deposit such fee in the state lottery fund. The remaining eight hundred dollars of such
129 fee shall be remitted to the illegal gaming enforcement fund, which the state treasurer
130 shall pay as follows:
131 (a) One hundred dollars shall be transmitted to the Missouri state highway
132 patrol for use in investigations and enforcement of sections 313.425 to 313.445;

HCS HB 2989 9
133 (b) Fifty dollars shall be transmitted to the Missouri attorney general's office for
134 use in illegal gambling enforcement;
135 (c) Fifty dollars shall be transmitted to the Missouri prosecutors pension fund;
136 (d) Four hundred dollars shall be transmitted to the Missouri veterans
137 commission; and
138 (e) Two hundred dollars shall be transmitted to the municipality in which the
139 video lottery game terminal is located, except that if a video lottery game terminal is
140 located in an unincorporated area of a county, the two hundred dollars shall be
141 transmitted to the county in which the video lottery game terminal is located.
142 (4) No license shall be issued to any person who has been convicted of a felony or
143 any crime involving illegal gambling.
144 (5) A licensee shall notify the commission of any change relating to the status of
145 its license or any other information contained in the application materials on file with
146 the commission.
147 4. Licensed video lottery game operators and licensed video lottery game
148 retailers shall enter into a use agreement for the placement of video lottery game
149 terminals. The video lottery game operator shall provide a true and accurate copy of
150 the executed use agreement to the video lottery game retailer within ten days after
151 execution of the use agreement by the parties. The use agreement shall be on a form
152 approved by the commission. The use agreement shall contain commercially reasonable
153 terms including, but not limited to, the following minimum requirements:
154 (1) An equal division of net terminal income between a video lottery game
155 operator and video lottery game retailer;
156 (2) A requirement that the video lottery game operator is to be responsible for
157 collection, remittance, and disbursement of gross gaming revenue, gross gaming revenue
158 tax, and net terminal income;
159 (3) An affirmative statement that no inducement was offered, proposed, or
160 accepted by either the video lottery game operator or the video lottery game retailer
161 regarding the placement or operation of video lottery game terminals at the premises of
162 the video lottery game retailer;
163 (4) An indemnity and hold harmless provision on behalf of the state, the
164 commission, and its agents relative to any cause of action arising out of the use
165 agreement between a video lottery game operator and a video lottery game retailer;
166 (5) A prohibition on the assignment of the agreement from or to any person
167 except from a video lottery game operator to another video lottery game operator or
168 from a video lottery game retailer to another video lottery game retailer, and providing
169 that all use agreements shall be otherwise freely assignable;

HCS HB 2989 10
170 (6) A release of the video lottery game retailer from any continuing contractual
171 obligation to the video lottery game operator if the video lottery game operator has its
172 license revoked or denied, has its renewal denied, or surrenders its license;
173 (7) A provision that the parties agree to modify the agreement to the extent
174 necessary to comply with a change in Missouri law or commission rules;
175 (8) A term not to exceed five years and shall not contain any automatic renewal
176 or extension of any such term; and
177 (9) Provisions approved by the commission.
178 5. No video lottery game retailer shall enter into a use agreement with more than
179 one video lottery game operator at any time. Only upon termination of a use agreement
180 with a video lottery game operator may a video lottery game retailer enter into a new
181 use agreement with a different video lottery game operator.
182 6. All licensees shall remain subject to all income taxes, sales taxes, and use taxes
183 lawfully assessed by this state, or any municipality, county, or other political subdivision
184 of this state; provided, however, that a municipality, county, or other political
185 subdivision of this state shall not impose, levy, collect, or assess any license
186 requirement, tax, or fee including, but not limited to, any permit tax or fee, sticker
187 fee, occupation tax or fee, amusement tax or fee, or taxes or fees upon the play, use,
188 ownership, lease, placement, operation, repair, service, transportation, or storage of any
189 video lottery game terminal, video lottery game, video lottery game manufacturer, video
190 lottery game distributor, video lottery game operator, or video lottery game retailer.
191 7. (1) Video lottery game terminals shall be inspected and approved by the
192 commission prior to being sold, leased, or transferred.
193 (2) Video lottery game manufacturers and video lottery game distributors may
194 buy, sell, or lease new or refurbished video lottery game terminals to and from video
195 lottery game manufacturers, video lottery game distributors, and video lottery game
196 operators.
197 (3) Redemption terminals shall meet independent testing standards approved by
198 the commission. The commission may approve redemption terminals that have been
199 approved by another state for operation for use as part of that state's video lottery game
200 system or similar system.
201 8. (1) Licensed video lottery game operators:
202 (a) May buy, lease, or rent video lottery game terminals from licensed video
203 lottery game manufacturers or distributors;
204 (b) May handle, place, service, and maintain video lottery game terminals; and
205 (c) Shall connect all video lottery game terminals to the central control system
206 approved by the commission.

HCS HB 2989 11
207 (2) All video lottery game tickets shall be redeemed using a redemption terminal.
208 Such redemption terminal shall be located within a video lottery game retailer's
209 establishment in direct proximity to such video lottery game terminals. Video lottery
210 game operators shall pay the commission thirty-two percent of any unclaimed cash
211 prize associated with each video lottery game ticket that has not been redeemed within
212 one hundred eighty days of issuance.
213 (3) A video lottery game operator shall not, directly or indirectly, lease real estate
214 to a video lottery game retailer. No lease of real property to a video lottery game retailer
215 may contain a provision requiring any sharing or splitting of net terminal income
216 between the lessor and the lessee, or any method of rent calculation using a percentage
217 of net terminal income, or any other similar provision or method for the determination
218 or calculation of any rent, concession, or other charge by a lessor to a lessee. Video
219 lottery game retailers shall submit true, accurate, and complete leases or similar
220 agreements regarding the premises of the video lottery game retailer to the commission
221 with their license application and annual license renewal application.
222 (4) Only a video lottery game operator or an operator's employee may negotiate
223 and enter into a use agreement with a video lottery game retailer for the initial or
224 continued placement of video lottery game terminals. Video lottery game operators and
225 video lottery game retailers shall not offer, propose, or accept anything of value, other
226 than the equal division of net terminal income in exchange for the execution of a use
227 agreement. No video lottery game operator or video lottery game retailer shall pay
228 compensation or any other valuable consideration to any third party for the solicitation,
229 procurement, execution, or delivery of any use agreement with a video lottery game
230 operator or video lottery game retailer, except as approved by the commission. A video
231 lottery game operator shall not share or split net terminal income with any other video
232 lottery game operator licensee under sections 313.425 to 313.445 or with any other
233 third-party, except as approved by the commission. The commission shall adopt rules
234 for the sharing or splitting of net terminal income by a video lottery game operator.
235 (5) Any agreement, contract, or arrangement for the initial or continued
236 placement of video lottery game terminals entered into by any person prior to being
237 duly licensed as a video lottery game operator or a video lottery game retailer by the
238 commission shall be invalid. Only use agreements by and between licensed video lottery
239 game operators and licensed video lottery game retailers shall be deemed valid for the
240 placement and operation of video lottery game terminals.
241 9. (1) To combat problem gambling, video lottery game operators shall allow
242 players to be self-excluded from video lottery game play pursuant to rules adopted by
243 the commission. Any person that has been self-excluded is guilty of trespassing in the

HCS HB 2989 12
244 first degree pursuant to section 569.140 if such person enters a designated video lottery
245 gaming area as defined by rules and regulations created by the Missouri lottery
246 commission pursuant to subsection 16 of section 313.429.
247 (2) Video lottery game operators may establish a player rewards systems
248 approved by the commission. No player shall be required to enroll in a rewards
249 program offered by a video lottery game operator as a condition to play video lottery
250 games.
251 10. (1) Video lottery game terminals shall not directly dispense anything of value
252 except for video lottery game tickets. Tickets shall be dispensed by pressing the ticket
253 dispensing button on the video lottery game terminal at the end of any video lottery
254 game play or series of plays. The value of video lottery game terminal credits shall be
255 determined by the commission. Video lottery game operators shall not be required to
256 pay out coins for prizes to be paid to a player having a value less than one dollar, and
257 redemption terminals shall not be required to dispense coins. Any prize to be paid to a
258 player having a value less than one dollar shall be dispensed to the player from the
259 redemption terminal in the form of a ticket, which may be inserted into a video lottery
260 game terminal for play. The commission may adopt rules allowing redemption
261 terminals to allow a player to donate prizes to be paid to a player having a value of less
262 than one dollar to charitable organizations.
263 (2) The maximum wager for a single video lottery game shall not exceed four
264 dollars. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 5 of section 313.321 to the
265 contrary, the maximum prize won from a single wager for video lottery game play shall
266 not exceed one thousand one hundred ninety-nine dollars or no more than one dollar
267 less than the minimum amount required to report gambling winnings from slot
268 machines pursuant to IRS Form W2G and IRS Form 5754.
269 (3) No more than eight video lottery game terminals may be placed at the
270 business premises of a video lottery game retailer.
271 (4) The play, use, or operation of video lottery games and video lottery game
272 terminals shall not be advertised to the public through any means including, but not
273 limited to, media outlets, social media advertising, direct mail, broadcast media,
274 telephone solicitation, billboards, or other signage. The commission may adopt rules
275 allowing for limited signage to be displayed at a video lottery game retailer's premises.
276 The advertising prohibition contained in this subdivision shall apply to all licensees
277 including, but not limited to, video lottery game manufacturers, video lottery game
278 distributors, video lottery game operators, video lottery game retailers, and video
279 lottery game handlers. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
280 there is no prohibition or restriction on direct or indirect marketing or advertising of

HCS HB 2989 13
281 video lottery games, video lottery game terminals, or redemption terminals by video
282 lottery game manufacturers, and video lottery game distributors to video lottery game
283 operators and video lottery game retailers. Video lottery game operators may advertise,
284 promote, and market to players of video lottery games and video lottery game terminals
285 through player rewards programs approved by the commission.
286 (5) Video lottery games shall not be played at any time when the video lottery
287 game retailer's establishment is closed for business.
288 11. (1) No person under twenty-one years of age shall play video lottery games
289 or video lottery game terminals. The video lottery game retailer shall be responsible for
290 preventing persons under twenty-one years of age from playing video lottery games or
291 video lottery game terminals.
292 (2) Video lottery game operators shall install, maintain, and operate video
293 surveillance systems within the immediate area of the video lottery game retailer's
294 establishment where video lottery game terminals and redemption terminals are
295 located. The surveillance system may also cover the perimeter of the video lottery game
296 retailer's premises. The video lottery game operator shall maintain video footage for
297 thirty days and shall, upon request, provide such footage to the commission. Video
298 footage taken by the video surveillance system shall:
299 (a) Be deleted and expunged after the thirty day period described in this
300 subdivision; and
301 (b) Not make use of any facial recognition technology or software.
302 (3) The commission shall adopt rules regarding the investigation and
303 enforcement of violations of law, rule, or regulation governing the conduct of video
304 lottery games in conformance with established commission procedures, which may
305 include fines, suspension, and revocation of licenses issued by the commission.
306 (4) A video lottery game operator shall post a sign in a conspicuous location
307 where such video lottery game terminals are located containing, in red lettering at least
308 one-half inch high on a white background, a telephone contact number (1-888-
309 BETSOFF) for the problem gambling helpline, or other similar information as
310 determined by the commission. The commission may adopt rules for the mandatory
311 posting of signage regarding problem gaming, underage gaming, and other consumer
312 protection measures.
313 (5) Pursuant to rules adopted by the department and the commission, a video
314 lottery game operator shall be responsible for:
315 (a) Paying prizes won from video lottery game play to winning players;
316 (b) Collecting all funds from video lottery game terminals;

HCS HB 2989 14
317 (c) Depositing all funds collected from video lottery game terminals into a
318 separate bank account maintained by the video lottery game operator to allow for
319 monthly electronic fund transfers by the commission and the department all applicable
320 adjusted gross gaming tax and municipality and county administration tax;
321 (d) After such transfer to the commission and the department, remitting to the
322 video lottery game retailer its share of net terminal income on not less than a monthly
323 basis. The video lottery game operator may thereafter transfer its share of net terminal
324 income to its business operations account; and
325 (e) The commission may adopt rules allowing for the division of net terminal
326 income between the video lottery game operator and the video lottery game retailer on a
327 basis other than an equal division of net terminal income.
328 (6) A video lottery game retailer or operator shall place a conspicuous warning
329 label or sticker on each video lottery game terminal at each video lottery game retailer
330 location in red lettering at least one-half inch high on white background that reads,
331 "WARNING: GAMBLING CAN BE ADDICTIVE".
332 12. The adjusted gross gaming revenue tax shall be imposed on adjusted gross
333 gaming revenue. Video lottery game operators shall collect and remit the adjusted gross
334 gaming revenue tax, which shall be deposited in the state lottery fund pursuant to rules
335 adopted by the commission. The commission shall use and transmit such funds as
336 follows:
337 (1) The commission shall retain an amount from the adjusted gross gaming
338 revenue tax necessary to cover direct administrative expenses for the regulation and
339 enforcement of the video lottery game program that are not covered by license fees or
340 reimbursements;
341 (2) Subject to appropriations, all remaining funds after administrative expenses
342 and payment of prizes shall be transferred to the lottery proceeds fund and shall be
343 appropriated equally to public elementary and secondary education and public
344 institutions of higher education as follows:
345 (a) Twenty percent of such funds shall be appropriated to the "Public
346 Elementary and Secondary School Construction and Rehabilitation Grant Fund" which
347 is hereby created. The state treasurer shall administer the fund, and the department of
348 elementary and secondary education shall establish criteria for the distribution of such
349 funds by rule. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any
350 moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of
351 the general revenue fund. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
352 credited to the fund; and

HCS HB 2989 15
353 (b) The public elementary and secondary school construction and rehabilitation
354 grant fund shall consist of all moneys transferred to it under this subsection, and all
355 moneys otherwise appropriated or donated to it. The funding provided for in this
356 subdivision shall supplement, and not supplant, any education funding otherwise
357 appropriated by the general assembly. The moneys in the public elementary and
358 secondary school construction and rehabilitation grant fund may be used for:
359 a. Public school construction or renovations; and
360 b. Enhancing credit and reducing the interest costs associated with school
361 district general obligation bonds funded by school bond property tax levies issued for
362 construction, capital improvements, renovations or rehabilitation.
363 13. The municipality and county administration tax shall be imposed on
364 adjusted gross gaming revenue. Video lottery game operators shall remit the
365 municipality and county administration tax to the department. The department shall
366 distribute such funds to the municipality or county identified by the commission
367 pursuant to subdivision (15) of subsection 2 of this section. The municipality or county
368 shall receive the proceeds of the municipality and county administration tax generated
369 by the video lottery game terminals located within the jurisdiction of the identified
370 municipality or county to be used for providing services necessary for the safety of the
371 public visiting a video lottery game retailer's location. All revenue owed to the
372 municipality or county shall be deposited and distributed to the municipality or county
373 in accordance with rules and regulations created by the department. All the funds
374 deposited with any municipality or county shall not be considered state funds and shall
375 be deposited in the municipality or county's general revenue fund to be expended as
376 provided for in this section.
377 14. All revenues received by the commission from license fees and any
378 reimbursements associated with the administration of the provisions of sections 313.425
379 to 313.445, and all interest earned thereon, shall be used for administrative expenses and
380 shall be deposited in the state lottery fund. Moneys deposited into the state lottery fund
381 from license fees and any reimbursements of commission administrative expenses to
382 administer sections 313.425 to 313.445 shall not be considered net proceeds under
383 Article III, Section 39(b) of the Constitution of Missouri. Subject to appropriation, up
384 to one percent of such license fees shall be deposited to the credit of the compulsive
385 gamblers fund created under section 313.842.
386 15. The commission may contract with a state law enforcement entity to assist in
387 conducting background investigations of video lottery game license applicants, and for
388 the enforcement of sections 313.425 to 313.445.

HCS HB 2989 16
389 (1) The Missouri lottery commission may require that fingerprint submissions
390 be made as part of an application seeking licensure for a video lottery game
391 manufacturer, video lottery game distributor, video lottery game operator, video lottery
392 game handler, or video lottery game retailer as defined in section 313.427.
393 (2) If the Missouri lottery commission requires that fingerprint submission be
394 made as part of such application, the Missouri lottery commission shall require
395 applicants to submit fingerprints to the Missouri state highway patrol for the purpose of
396 conducting a state and federal fingerprint-based criminal history background check.
397 (3) The fingerprints and any required fees shall be sent to the Missouri state
398 highway patrol's central repository. The fingerprints shall be used for searching the
399 state criminal records repository and shall also be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of
400 Investigation for a federal criminal records search under section 43.540. The Missouri
401 state highway patrol shall notify the Missouri lottery commission of any criminal history
402 record information or lack of criminal history record information discovered on the
403 individual. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 610.120 to the contrary, all
404 records related to any criminal history information discovered shall be accessible and
405 available to the Missouri lottery commission.
406 16. The commission shall adopt rules for the implementation of the video lottery
407 game system authorized under sections 313.425 to 313.445, including, but not limited to,
408 a designation of a distinct, designated area within a video lottery game retailer's
409 premises that is out of sight from the front or main entrance as the video lottery gaming
410 area that is divided from the primary business operation area of the video lottery game
411 retailer's premises where all video lottery game terminals and redemption terminals
412 shall be placed and operated and all gaming activity shall be conducted. Any rule or
413 portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
414 authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
415 subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
416 section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
417 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
418 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
419 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be
420 invalid and void.
313.431. In order to expedite the orderly implementation of the video lottery
game system authorized under sections 313.425 to 313.445, the commission shall:
(1) Contract for the supply and operation of a central control system no later
than ninety days after the effective date of sections 313.425 to 313.445;

HCS HB 2989 17
(2) Make license applications for video lottery game manufacturers, video
lottery game distributors, video lottery game operators, video lottery game retailers,
and video lottery game handlers available to applicants no later than thirty days after
the effective date of sections 313.425 to 313.445;
(3) Accept applications and promulgate any emergency rules or regular rules
and regulations needed for the implementation of the video lottery game system
authorized under sections 313.425 to 313.445 no later than one hundred twenty days
after the effective date of sections 313.425 to 313.445;
(4) Begin issuing licenses under sections 313.425 to 313.445 no later than one
hundred twenty days after the effective date of this section;
(5) Issue an approved form use agreement no later than ninety days after the
effective date of sections 313.425 to 313.445;
(6) Establish a start date when all video lottery game operators may begin
soliciting use agreements with video lottery game retailers for the placement of video
lottery game terminals. No video lottery game operator shall solicit use agreements
prior to the start date. Such start date shall be set no more than one hundred eighty
days after the effective date of sections 313.425 to 313.445;
(7) Approve or deny any completed video lottery game retailer application or
video lottery game operator application no more than ninety days after such application
is received by the commission. The operation of unregulated amusement devices or
unregulated gambling devices shall not be the sole cause for denial of a video lottery
game retailer license or a video lottery game operator license; and
(8) Establish a date by which the system of video lottery game terminals shall be
operational. The operational date shall be no later than three hundred sixty five days
after the effective date of sections 313.425 to 313.445.
313.433. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
participation by a person, firm, corporation, or organization in any aspect of the
state lottery under sections 313.425 to 313.445 shall not be construed to be a lottery or
gift enterprise in violation of Article III, Section 39 of the Constitution of Missouri.
313.435. 1. A municipality may adopt an ordinance prohibiting video lottery
game terminals within the corporate limits of such municipality within one hundred
twenty days after the effective date of this act. Such municipality shall notify the
commission of the ordinance within seven days of passage. A municipality that has
adopted such an ordinance may at any time thereafter adopt an ordinance allowing
video lottery game terminals within the corporate limits of such municipality, but may
not after the passage of such ordinance adopt any ordinance prohibiting video lottery
game terminals within the corporate limits of such municipality.

HCS HB 2989 18
2. A county commission may, for the unincorporated area of the county, adopt
an ordinance prohibiting video lottery game terminals within the unincorporated area
of the county within one hundred twenty days from the effective date of this act. Such
county shall notify the commission of the ordinance within seven days of passage. A
county commission that has adopted such an ordinance may at any time thereafter
adopt an ordinance allowing video lottery game terminals within the unincorporated
area of the county, but may not after the passage of such ordinance adopt any ordinance
prohibiting video lottery game terminals within the unincorporated area of the county.
3. Any municipality or county adopting an ordinance that prohibits the licensing
of video lottery games shall notify the commission of such action and provide a certified
copy of such ordinance to the commission. Upon receiving such notification and
ordinance, the commission shall not license video lottery game retailers within such area
covered by such municipal or county ordinance.
4. If any such municipality or county that has opted to prohibit the use of video
lottery game terminals to play video lottery games repeals such ordinance and adopts an
ordinance allowing video lottery game terminals within such municipality or county,
then such municipality or county shall notify the commission, and the commission may
license video lottery game retailers within such municipality or county to conduct video
lottery games.
313.437. 1. Nothing in sections 313.425 to 313.445 shall be construed to prohibit
or bar the issuance of any license described therein to an applicant on the basis of that
applicant's operation, handling, leasing, licensing, servicing, or placing of machines or
devices, except that any video lottery game retailer shall attest, on a form provided by
the commission, that the video lottery game retailer does not own or possess any illegal
gambling devices, or other machines or devices where the player pays money to play a
game of skill or chance which may result in a cash award or prize to the player. This
form shall be submitted with a person's application for any license authorized under
sections 313.425 to 313.445.
2. The general assembly, by enacting sections 313.425 to 313.445, intends to
enact a comprehensive scheme of statewide regulation, and further intends to preempt
any other regulation of the area covered by sections 313.425 to 313.445. No
municipality, county, governmental subdivision, or agency may enact or enforce any
law, ordinance, or regulation that regulates, taxes, imposes a fee, or makes any conduct
in the area covered by sections 313.425 to 313.445 an offense, or the subject of a criminal
or civil penalty or sanction of any kind.
313.438. 1. The application form for licensure under sections 313.425 to 313.445
shall be prescribed by the commission and shall contain the following information:

HCS HB 2989 19
(1) The name, date of birth, and address of the individual or organization;
(2) A statement as to whether the individual or organization has had any
previous application refused, or any license revoked or suspended;
(3) A copy of the articles of incorporation and certificate of incorporation of the
organization, if applicable;
(4) A sworn statement signed by the individual or chief officer and the secretary
of the organization verifying that the statements contained in the application are true;
(5) The name and address of a person authorized to receive service of process on
behalf of the organization; and
(6) Such other information deemed necessary by the commission or as the
commission may promulgate by regulation.
2. The commission shall issue, suspend, revoke, and renew licenses under
sections 313.425 to 313.445 pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the
commission. Licensing rules and regulations shall include requirements relating to
the financial responsibility of the licensee, the security and efficient operation of the
video lottery game, and other matters necessary to protect the public interest and trust
in the lottery. Licensees shall be selected without regard to political affiliation.
3. The commission shall require every licensee to post a bond, a bonding fee, or a
letter of credit in such amount as may be required by the commission, and upon
licensure shall prominently display the licensee's license, or a copy thereof, as provided
in the rules and regulations of the commission.
4. Any license issued by the commission shall not be assignable or transferable.
5. A license shall be revoked upon a finding that the licensee:
(1) Has knowingly provided false or misleading information to the commission
or its employees;
(2) Has been convicted of any felony; or
(3) Has endangered the security of the lottery.
6. A license may be suspended, revoked, or not renewed for any of the following
causes:
(1) A change of business location;
(2) A delinquency in remitting money owed to the commission; or
(3) Any violation of any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this section by
the commission.
7. A person who knowingly makes a false statement on an application is guilty of
a class A misdemeanor and shall not be eligible for any license by the commission.

HCS HB 2989 20
8. A renewal application shall only include any changes in the information
required to be submitted with the initial application or such other information required
by the commission.
(1) A blank form for application for registration shall be mailed to each person
licensed in this state at the person's last known office or residence address. Failure to
receive such application shall not, however, relieve any person of the duty to renew and
pay the required fee, nor exempt the person from the penalties provided by this chapter
for failure to renew.
(2) If a person licensed, certified, or registered by the commission does not renew
such license, such license shall be deemed void.
9. The commission shall submit fingerprints for any person seeking issuance or
renewal of a license issued by the commission, for the purpose of checking the person's
prior criminal history when the commission determines a nationwide check is
warranted. The fingerprint cards and any required fees shall be sent to the Missouri
state highway patrol's central repository. The fingerprints shall be used for searching
the state criminal history repository and shall also be forwarded to the Federal Bureau
of Investigation for the searching of the federal criminal history files under section
43.540. The patrol shall notify the commission of any criminal history information or
lack of criminal history information discovered on the individual. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 610.120 to the contrary, all records related to any criminal history
information discovered shall be accessible and available to the commission.
10. It is the burden of the applicant to show by clear and convincing evidence the
applicant's suitability as to character, experience, and other factors as may be deemed
appropriate by the commission.
11. Before a license is granted, the commission shall conduct a thorough
investigation of the applicant for a license. The applicant shall provide information on a
form as required by the commission.
12. Any organization licensed under sections 313.425 to 313.445 that changes any
of its officers, directors, or officials during the term of the license shall immediately
report the names and addresses of such individuals to the commission, along with a
sworn statement of each such individual as required on forms furnished by the
commission.
13. The following persons and organizations shall not be eligible for any license
under the provisions of sections 313.425 to 313.445 and shall not participate in the
management, conduct, or operation of any video lottery game, video lottery game
handler, video lottery game distributor, video lottery game retailer, video lottery game
operator, or video lottery game manufacturer:

HCS HB 2989 21
(1) Any person who has been convicted of a felony;
(2) Any person who has been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any
illegal gambling activity or forfeited bond for not appearing while charged with any
illegal gambling activity;
(3) Any person the commission has determined, based on the person's prior
activities or criminal record, if any, poses a threat to the public interest or to the
effective regulation and control of video lottery games, or creates or enhances the
dangers of unsuitable, unfair, or illegal practices, methods, or activities in the conduct of
video lottery games;
(4) Any firm, organization, or corporation in which a person defined in
subdivision (3) of this subsection is an owner, officer, or director, whether compensated
or not;
(5) Any firm, organization, or corporation in which a person defined in
subdivision (3) of this subsection is to participate in the management or operations of a
video lottery game, video lottery game handler, video lottery game distributor, video
lottery game manufacturer, video lottery game operator, or video lottery game retailer;
(6) Any person who, at the time of the application for renewal of a license, would
not be eligible for such license upon first application.
313.439. 1. The commission may refuse to issue a license and a licensee shall be
subject to the imposition of penalties, suspension or revocation of such license, or other
action for any act or failure to act by the licensee or the licensee's agents or employees,
that is injurious to the public health, safety, good order, and general welfare of the
people of the state of Missouri, or that would discredit or tend to discredit the video
lottery operations in the state of Missouri unless the licensee proves by clear and
convincing evidence that the licensee is not guilty of such action. The commission shall
notify the applicant or licensee in writing of the reasons for the refusal or discipline, and
shall advise the applicant or licensee of their right to file a complaint with the
administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter 621. If no written request
for a hearing is received by the administrative hearing commission within the thirty-day
period, the right to seek review of the commission's decision shall be considered as
waived. The commission shall take appropriate action against any applicant or licensee
who violates the law or the rules and regulations of the commission. Without limiting
other provisions of sections 313.425 to 313.445, the following acts or omissions may be
grounds for such discipline:
(1) Failing to comply with or make provision for compliance with the provisions
of sections 313.425 to 313.445, the rules and regulations of the commission, or any
federal, state, or local law or regulation;

HCS HB 2989 22
(2) Failing to comply with any rule, order, or ruling of the commission or its
agents pertaining to sections 313.425 to 313.445;
(3) Receiving or purchasing goods or services from a person or business entity
who does not hold a license issued pursuant to sections 313.425 to 313.445, but who is
required to hold such license by the provisions of sections 313.425 to 313.445 or the rules
and regulations of the commission;
(4) Associating with, either socially or in business affairs, or employing persons
of notorious or unsavory reputation or who have extensive police records, or who have
failed to cooperate with any officially constituted investigatory or administrative body
and would adversely affect public confidence and trust in gaming;
(5) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation, or bribery in securing any license
issued pursuant to the provisions of sections 313.425 to 313.445 or impersonation of any
person holding a license or allowing a person to use the person's license;
(6) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge, or other compensation by
fraud, deception, or misrepresentation;
(7) Incompetence, misconduct, gross negligence, fraud, misrepresentation, or
dishonesty in the performance of the functions or duties regulated by the provisions of
sections 313.425 to 313.445;
(8) Revocation, suspension, restriction, modification, limitation, reprimand,
warning, censure, probation, or other final disciplinary action against the licensee or
applicant for a license by another state, territory, federal agency, or country, whether or
not voluntarily agreed to by the licensee or applicant, including, but not limited to, the
denial of licensure, or surrender of the license;
(9) A person is finally adjudged incapacitated or disabled by a court of
competent jurisdiction;
(10) Issuance of a license based upon a material mistake of fact;
(11) Knowingly making a false statement, orally or in writing, to the commission.
2. The commission may cause a complaint to be filed with the administrative
hearing commission as provided by chapter 621 against any applicant or holder of any
license required by sections 313.425 to 313.445, or against any person who has failed to
renew or has surrendered the person's license.
3. After the filing of such complaint before the administrative hearing
commission, the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing commission that the grounds
of this section for disciplinary action are met, the commission may, singly or in
combination, warn, censure, or place the person named in the complaint on probation
on such terms and conditions as the commission deems appropriate for a period not to

HCS HB 2989 23
exceed ten years, or may suspend the person's license for a period not to exceed three
years, or restrict or limit the person's license for an indefinite period of time, or revoke
the person's license or administer a public or private reprimand, or deny the person's
application for a license, or permanently withhold issuance of a license.
313.440. The administration of sections 313.425 to 313.445 shall be vested in the
commission which shall have power to adopt and enforce rules and regulations to
regulate and license the management, operation, and conduct of video lottery games and
participants therein and to properly administer and enforce the provisions of sections
313.425 to 313.445. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
313.441. The commission shall employ such professional, clerical, technical, and
administrative personnel as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of sections
313.425 to 313.445. No person shall be employed by the lottery who has been convicted
of a felony. Any person employed by the lottery in a management or policy-making
position shall be a resident of this state or become a Missouri resident within six months
of the person's appointment. Personnel shall be employed without regard to any
political affiliation. Personnel shall receive a salary comparable to the salaries received
by other state employees doing comparable duties.
313.442. 1. The commission may administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, issue
subpoenas duces tecum, and require production of documents and records. Subpoenas,
including subpoenas duces tecum, shall be served by a person authorized to serve
subpoenas of courts of record. In lieu of requiring attendance of a person to produce
original documents in response to a subpoena duces tecum, the commission may require
sworn copies of such documents to be filed with it or delivered to its designated
representative.
2. The commission may enforce its subpoenas, including subpoena duces tecum,
by applying to a circuit court of Cole County, the county of the investigation, hearing or
proceeding, or any county where the person resides or may be found, for an order upon
any person who shall fail to obey a subpoena to show cause why such subpoena should
not be enforced, which such order and a copy of the application therefore shall be served
upon the person in the same manner as a summons in a civil action, and if the circuit

HCS HB 2989 24
court shall, after a hearing, determine that the subpoena should be sustained and
enforced, such court shall proceed to enforce the subpoena in the same manner as
though the subpoena had been issued in a civil case in the circuit court.
313.443. Upon application by the commission, and the necessary burden having
been met, a court of general jurisdiction may grant an injunction, restraining order, or
other order as may be appropriate to enjoin a person from offering to engage or
engaging in the performance of any acts or practices for which a license is required by
sections 313.425 to 313.445 upon a showing that such acts or practices were performed
or offered to be performed without a license. Any such action shall be commenced
either in the county in which such conduct occurred or in the county in which the
defendant resides. Any action brought under this section shall be in addition to and not
in lieu of any penalty provided by sections 313.425 to 313.445 and may be brought
concurrently with other actions to enforce the provisions of sections 313.425 to 313.445.
313.444. Upon receiving information that any provision of sections 313.425 to
313.445 has been or is being violated, the commission or other person designated by the
commission shall investigate, and upon probable cause appearing, the commission shall
file a complaint with the administrative hearing commission or appropriate official or
court.
313.445. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1.140, the provisions of
sections 313.425 to 313.445 and 572.020, 572.070, and 572.100 shall be nonseverable, and
if any provision is for any reason held be invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the
remaining provisions of sections 313.425 to 313.445, 572.020, 572.070, and 572.100, as
amended by this act.
313.820. 1. An excursion boat licensee shall pay to the commission an admission fee
of [two] four dollars for each person embarking on an excursion gambling boat with a ticket
of admission. One dollar of such fee shall be deposited to the credit of the gaming
commission fund as authorized pursuant to section 313.835, two dollars of such fee shall be
transferred to the Missouri veterans commission as established under section 42.007,
and one dollar of such fee shall not be considered state funds and shall be paid to the home
dock city or county. Subject to appropriation, one cent of such fee deposited to the credit of
the gaming commission fund may be deposited to the credit of the compulsive gamblers fund
created pursuant to the provisions of section 313.842. Nothing in this section shall preclude
any licensee from charging any amount deemed necessary for a ticket of admission to any
person embarking on an excursion gambling boat. If tickets are issued which are good for
more than one excursion, the admission fee shall be paid to the commission for each person
using the ticket on each excursion that the ticket is used. If free passes or complimentary
admission tickets are issued, the excursion boat licensee shall pay to the commission the same

HCS HB 2989 25
fee upon these passes or complimentary tickets as if they were sold at the regular and usual
admission rate; however, the excursion boat licensee may issue fee-free passes to actual and
necessary officials and employees of the licensee or other persons actually working on the
excursion gambling boat. The issuance of fee-free passes is subject to the rules of the
commission, and a list of all persons to whom the fee-free passes are issued shall be filed with
the commission.
2. All licensees are subject to all income taxes, sales taxes, earnings taxes, use taxes,
property taxes or any other tax or fee now or hereafter lawfully levied by any political
subdivision; however, no other license tax, permit tax, occupation tax, excursion fee, or taxes
or fees shall be imposed, levied or assessed exclusively upon licensees by a political
subdivision. All state taxes not connected directly to gambling games shall be collected by
the department of revenue. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 32.057 to the contrary,
the department of revenue may furnish and the commission may receive tax information to
determine if applicants or licensees are complying with the tax laws of this state; however,
any tax information acquired by the commission shall not become public record and shall be
used exclusively for commission business.
572.010. 1. As used in this chapter the following terms mean:
(1) "Advance gambling activity", a person advances gambling activity if, acting other
than as a player, he or she engages in conduct that materially aids any form of gambling
activity. Conduct of this nature includes but is not limited to conduct directed toward the
creation or establishment of the particular game, lottery, contest, scheme, gambling,device or
activity involved, toward the acquisition or maintenance of premises, paraphernalia,
equipment or apparatus therefor, toward the solicitation or inducement of persons to
participate therein, toward the actual conduct of the playing phases thereof, toward the
arrangement or communication of any of its financial or recording phases, or toward any
other phase of its operation. A person advances gambling activity if, having substantial
proprietary control or other authoritative control over premises being used with his or her
knowledge for purposes of gambling activity, he or she permits that activity to occur or
continue or makes no effort to prevent its occurrence or continuation. The supplying,
servicing and operation of a licensed excursion gambling boat under sections 313.800 to
313.840 does not constitute advancing gambling activity. The owning, operating,
supplying, or servicing of video lottery game terminals under sections 313.425 to
313.437 does not constitute advancing gambling activity;
(2) "Bookmaking", advancing gambling activity by unlawfully accepting bets from
members of the public as a business, rather than in a casual or personal fashion, upon the
outcomes of future contingent events;

HCS HB 2989 26
(3) "Contest of chance", any contest, game, gaming scheme, or [gaming] gambling
device in which the outcome [depends in a material degree upon an] of the contest is
determined by any element of chance, notwithstanding that the skill of the contestants may
also be a factor therein;
(4) "Gambling", a person engages in gambling when:
(a) He or she operates, plays, or participates in the operation of a gambling
device; or
(b) He or she stakes or risks something of value upon the outcome of a contest of
chance or a future contingent event not under his or her control or influence, upon an
agreement or understanding that he or she will receive something of value in the event of a
certain outcome. Gambling does not include bona fide business transactions valid under the
law of contracts, including but not limited to contracts for the purchase or sale at a future date
of securities or commodities, and agreements to compensate for loss caused by the happening
of chance, including but not limited to contracts of indemnity or guaranty and life, health or
accident insurance; nor does gambling include playing an amusement device that confers only
an immediate right of replay not exchangeable for something of value. Gambling does not
include any licensed activity, or persons participating in such games which are covered by
sections 313.800 to 313.840. Gambling does not include any licensed activity or persons
participating in such licensed activity, licensed video lottery game terminals, or video
lottery games under sections 313.425 to 313.437;
(5) ["Gambling device", any device, machine, paraphernalia or equipment that is used
or usable in the playing phases of any gambling activity, whether that activity consists of
gambling between persons or gambling by a person with a machine. However, lottery tickets,
policy slips and other items used in the playing phases of lottery and policy schemes are not
gambling devices within this definition;
(6)] "Gambling record", any article, instrument, record, receipt, ticket, certificate,
token, slip or notation used or intended to be used in connection with unlawful gambling
activity;
[(7)] (6) "Lottery" or "policy", an unlawful gambling scheme in which for a
consideration the participants are given an opportunity to win something of value, the award
of which is determined by chance;
[(8)] (7) "Player", a person who engages in any form of gambling solely as a
contestant or bettor, without receiving or becoming entitled to receive any profit therefrom
other than personal gambling winnings, and without otherwise rendering any material
assistance to the establishment, conduct or operation of the particular gambling activity. A
person who gambles at a social game of chance on equal terms with the other participants
therein does not otherwise render material assistance to the establishment, conduct or

HCS HB 2989 27
operation thereof by performing, without fee or remuneration, acts directed toward the
arrangement or facilitation of the game, such as inviting persons to play, permitting the use of
premises therefor and supplying cards or other equipment used therein. A person who
engages in "bookmaking" as defined in subdivision (2) of this section is not a player;
[(9)] (8) "Professional player", a player who engages in gambling for a livelihood or
who has derived at least twenty percent of his or her income in any one year within the past
five years from acting solely as a player;
[(10)] (9) "Profit from gambling activity", a person profits from gambling activity if,
other than as a player, he or she accepts or receives money or other property pursuant to an
agreement or understanding with any person whereby he participates or is to participate in the
proceeds of gambling activity;
[(11)] (10) "Slot machine"[, a gambling device that as a result of the insertion of a
coin or other object operates, either completely automatically or with the aid of some physical
act by the player, in such a manner that, depending upon elements of chance, it may eject
something of value. A device so constructed or readily adaptable or convertible to such use is
no less a slot machine because it is not in working order or because some mechanical act of
manipulation or repair is required to accomplish its adaptation, conversion or workability.
Nor is it any less a slot machine because apart from its use or adaptability as such it may also
sell or deliver something of value on a basis other than chance] or "gambling device", an
electronic, computerized, or mechanical machine, terminal, or other similar device that:
(a) Requires the direct or indirect insertion of any form of consideration, coin,
currency, ticket, token, electronic token or currency, or other similar object, or the
depositing of any form of consideration with the owner or operator of such slot machine
or gambling device to operate the device;
(b) Offers, operates, or plays a contest or game, either completely automatically
or with the aid of some physical act by the player, the outcome of which is determined by
any element of chance, regardless of whether the outcome may also be partially or
predominantly determined by the skill of the player, and regardless of whether the
outcome may be partially or completely revealed to the player before or during play of
the slot machine or gambling device; and
(c) May award to the player an award, prize, or something of value, whether or
not the award is made directly or indirectly, and whether or not the award is made
automatically from the gambling device or manually.

A device so constructed or readily adaptable or convertible to such use is no less a slot
machine or gambling device because it is not in working order or because some
mechanical act of manipulation or repair is required to accomplish its adaptation,

HCS HB 2989 28
conversion, or workability, nor is it any less a slot machine or gambling device because
apart from its use or adaptability as such it may also sell or deliver something of value
on a basis other than chance. A slot machine or gambling device does not include
licensed video lottery game terminals or video lottery games under sections 313.425 to
313.437;
100 [(12)] (11) "Something of value", any money or property, any token, object or article
101 exchangeable for money or property, or any form of credit or promise directly or indirectly
102 contemplating transfer of money or property or of any interest therein or involving extension
103 of a service, entertainment or a privilege of playing at a game or scheme without charge;
104 [(13)] (12) "Unlawful", not specifically authorized by law.
105 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1.140 to the contrary, the provisions
106 of this section and sections 313.425 to 313.445 shall be nonseverable, and if any
107 provision is for any reason held to be invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the
108 remaining provisions of this section and sections 313.425 and 313.445, as amended by
109 this act.
572.020. 1. A person commits the offense of gambling if he or she knowingly
engages in gambling.
2. The offense of gambling is a class [C misdemeanor unless:
(1) It is committed by a professional player, in which case it is a class A
misdemeanor; or
(2) The person knowingly engages in gambling with a child less than seventeen years
of age, in which case it is a class B misdemeanor] A misdemeanor.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1.140 to the contrary, the provisions
of this section and sections 313.425 to 313.445 shall be nonseverable, and if any
provision is for any reason held to be invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the
remaining provisions of this section and sections 313.425 and 313.445, as amended by
this act.
572.070. 1. A person commits the offense of possession of a gambling device if, with
knowledge of the character thereof, he or she manufactures, sells, transports, places or
possesses, or conducts or negotiates any transaction affecting or designed to affect ownership,
custody or use of:
(1) A slot machine or gambling device; or
(2) Any other gambling device, knowing or having reason to believe that it is to be
used in the state of Missouri in the advancement of unlawful gambling activity.
2. The offense of possession of a gambling device is a class A misdemeanor.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1.140 to the contrary, the provisions
of this section and sections 313.425 to 313.445 shall be nonseverable, and if any

HCS HB 2989 29
provision is for any reason held to be invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the
remaining provisions of this section and sections 313.425 and 313.445, as amended by
this act.
4. The provisions of this section shall not be enforceable:
(1) Before August 28, 2028; or
(2) During the pendency of any litigation concerning sections 313.425 to 313.445,
if such litigation is initiated in a court of competent jurisdiction before August 28, 2028.
572.100. 1. The general assembly by enacting this chapter intends to preempt any
other regulation of the area covered by this chapter. No governmental subdivision or agency
may enact or enforce a law that regulates or makes any conduct in the area covered by this
chapter an offense, or the subject of a criminal or civil penalty or sanction of any kind.
2. The term "gambling", as used in this chapter, does not include licensed activities
under sections 313.800 to 313.840, and does not include licensed activities under sections
313.425 to 313.437.
3. The Missouri lottery commission shall have concurrent authority and
jurisdiction to investigate and enforce violations of chapter 572, and to seek prosecution
of violations of chapter 572 by the attorney general pursuant to section 27.105.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1.140 to the contrary, the provisions
of this section and sections 313.425 to 313.445 shall be nonseverable, and if any
provision is for any reason held to be invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the
remaining provisions of this section and sections 313.425 and 313.445, as amended by
this act.
Section B. The repeal and reenactment of Sections 572.020, 572.070, and 572.100 of
Section A of this act shall become effective on August 28, 2028.
✔